Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 20.1. Western Virginia Public Education Consortium.

§ 22.1-354.1.
Western Virginia Public Education Consortium and board created; region defined; governing board; chairman’s executive summary.

The Western Virginia Public Education Consortium is hereby established and shall be referred to as the Consortium. For the purposes of this chapter and the work of the Consortium, “Western Virginia” shall include the Counties of Alleghany, Bath, Bland, Botetourt, Craig, Floyd, Franklin, Giles, Henry, Montgomery, Patrick, Pulaski, Roanoke, and Wythe, and the Cities of Covington, Martinsville, Radford, Roanoke, and Salem. The governing board of the Consortium shall consist of 33 members that include 14 legislative members and the 19 school superintendents of the named localities as follows: 10 members of the House of Delegates representing the Fifth, Sixth, Seventh, Eighth, Ninth, Eleventh, Twelfth, Sixteenth, Seventeenth, and Nineteenth House Districts; four members of the Senate representing the Nineteenth, Twentieth, Twenty-first, and Twenty-fifth Senatorial Districts, all serving as ex officio nonvoting members; and the school superintendents of Alleghany, Bath, Bland, Botetourt, Craig, Floyd, Franklin, Giles, Henry, Montgomery, Patrick, Pulaski, Roanoke County, Wythe, Covington, Martinsville, Radford, Roanoke City, and Salem.

Legislative members and school superintendents shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in the work of the Consortium as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. All such expenses shall be paid from existing appropriations to or received by the Consortium or, if unfunded, shall be approved by the Joint Rules Committee.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board shall meet at the call of the chairman or whenever a majority of the members so request.

The chairman of the board shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the board no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2000, cc. 105, 302; 2002, cc. 417, 465; 2003, c. 885; 2006, c. 861; 2016, c. 232.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7, provides: “That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 417 and 465 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “Bath,” “Henry,” “Patrick,” and “Martinsville.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 in subsection A, deleted “in this chapter” preceding “as the Consortium”, inserted “34 members that include 15 legislative members and”, “19”, substituted “as follows: 11 members . . . and Salem” for “The region’s legislators shall serve as nonvoting, advisory members of the board”; added the present subsection B; redesignated former subsection B as C; in subsection C, inserted “serve without compensation. All members shall”, substituted “all reasonable and necessary” for “their actual”; substituted “as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

” for “The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members”, and added the third sentence; and added subsections D and E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 861, in subsection A, deleted “Clifton Forge” following “Covington” in the first sentence and deleted “and Clifton Forge” following “Alleghany” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 232, in subsection A, substituted “33 members that include 14 legislative members” for “34 members that include 15 legislative members,” and “10 members of the House” for “11 members of the House,” deleted “Tenth” from the list of House Districts, and inserted “Nineteenth” and deleted “Twenty-second” in the list of Senatorial Districts.

§ 22.1-354.2.
Functions and duties.

The Consortium shall perform the following functions and duties:

Coordinate with organizations and agencies providing programs and services to Consortium school divisions to reduce duplication of effort and optimize the use of available resources;

Conduct ongoing assessments to identify needs of member school divisions and develop plans and programs responding to those needs;

Facilitate the coordination of programs in the Consortium region that affect K through 12 public education in career and technical education, workforce development, and other linkages between public schools, institutions of higher education, and business and industry;

Coordinate technology-related activities between Consortium members in areas of common concern, such as video conferencing and distance learning, including the acquisition and utilization of hardware and software for administrative and instructional purchases;

Develop and maintain linkages with schools and school divisions in Northern Virginia to promote enhanced usage of educational technology; and

Create the capacity for development within the Consortium of shared services and activities, including purchasing, facility planning, staff development, and special needs programming, and implementation of such shared services and activities as need is determined.

History.

2000, cc. 105, 302; 2001, c. 483.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career” for “vocational” in subdivision 3.

§ 22.1-354.3.
Executive director; staff support.

From such funds as may be appropriated or received, the board of the Consortium may appoint an executive director, who shall be authorized to employ such staff as necessary to enable the Consortium to perform its duties as set forth in this chapter. The board is authorized to determine the duties of such staff and to fix salaries and compensation from such funds as may be appropriated or received.

History.

2000, cc. 105, 302; 2002, cc. 417, 465.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 417 and 465 deleted the former final sentence, which read: “The Consortium’s offices shall be housed at Radford University.”

§ 22.1-354.4.
Application for and acceptance of gifts and grants.

The Consortium is authorized to apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources to enable it to carry out its objectives.

History.

2000, cc. 105, 302.

§ 22.1-354.5.
Cooperation of other agencies.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Consortium and, upon request, assist the Consortium in the performance of its duties and responsibilities.

History.

2000, cc. 105, 302.